Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0070.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 115. The portion of highway M-34 in Hillsdale County between Pioneer Road and South Pittsford Road shall be known as the Deputy Sheriff William Butler, Jr. Memorial Highway. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor